Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-623
Benefits; how paid.

All benefits provided in the Employment Security Law shall be payable from the Unemployment Compensation Fund. All benefits shall be paid through employment offices in accordance with rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the Commissioner of Labor.

Laws 1937, c. 108, § 3, p. 374;

Laws 1939, c. 56, § 2, p. 233;

Laws 1941, c. 94, § 2, p. 381;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 48-703;

R.S.1943, § 48-623;

Laws 1985, LB 339, § 19;

Laws 2017, LB172, § 24.